src/esu.twol.xfst
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Alaskuk Strunk"

! This Central Alaskan Yup'ik FST morphological analyzer/generator and the 
! associated source code is available under the GNU Affero General Public 
! License (GNU AGPL v.3):
!
! Copyright (C) 2020 Lonny Alaskuk Strunk
!
! This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it under 
! the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by the Free 
! Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or (at your option) any 
! later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but WITHOUT 
! ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS 
! FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU Affero General Public License for more 
! details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License along 
! with this program. If not, see https://www.gnu.org/licenses/.


!! NOTE !!!
! 1. Morpheme Operators are indicated by ">"
! 2. Vowels may be hatted or stressed (i.e. a -> [â|á])

! TODO:
!   - 

define Stop       [ p | t | c | k | q ];
define VoiceFric  [ v | l | s | g | r | u͡g | u͡r | ġ ];
define VlessFric  [ vv | ll | ss | gg | rr | u͡gg | u͡rr ];
define VoiceNasal [ m | n | ng ];
define VlessNasal [ m̄ | n̄ | n͞g ];

define VoiceCon   [ VoiceFric | VoiceNasal ];
define VlessCon   [ VlessFric | VlessNasal | Stop ];

define Fric       [ VlessFric  | VoiceFric  ];
define Nasal      [ VlessNasal | VoiceNasal ];

define Con        [ Stop | Fric | Nasal | w | y ];

define FVow       [ a | i | u | ạ | ụ ];
define FVowStress [ á | í | ú | ạ́ | ụ́ ];
define FVowHatted [ â | î | û | ậ | ụ̂ ];
define AllFVow    [ FVow | FVowStress | FVowHatted ];
define Vow        [ FVow | e ];
define VowStress  [ FVowStress | é ];
define VowHatted  [ FVowHatted | ê ];
define AllVow     [ Vow | VowStress | VowHatted ];

define AutomaticDevoicing v -> vv,
                          l -> ll,
                          s -> ss,
                          g -> gg,
                          r -> rr,
                          u͡g -> u͡gg,
                          u͡r -> u͡rr || [ Stop | VlessFric ] ">"* _  ,
                                     _ ">"* [ Stop | VlessFric ]             .o.
                          m -> m̄,
                          n -> n̄,
                          ng -> n͞g || [ Stop | VlessFric ] ">"* _   ;

! Unnecessary devoicing                          
!                          r -> rr  || _ ">"* .#.                            .o.
!                          s -> ss  || .#. ">"* _                             ;

define WeakInitialE [..] -> e   || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con _ ">"* Con                      .o. ! [é]nmek -> [e]nemek
                       ê -> e   || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con _ ">"* Con                      .o. ! [e]nêli -> enel'iuq
                    [..] -> "ʼ" || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con AllVow ">"+ Con _ ">"* AllVow   .o. ! [e]nemek -> nem'ek
                    [..] -> "ʼ" || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con AllVow Con _ ">"+ AllVow        .o. ! [e]mer -> mer'et
                    ["[e]"|"[é]"] -> 0  || .#. _ Con AllVow ">"* Con                      ;  ! drop weak e ; not [e]nii

define urDeletion [ụ|ụ́] r (->) u r                           || g ">" _ l                .o. ! acagurluq (HBC form)
                  [ụ|ụ́] r -> e ("ʼ") "u͡r"                    || g ">" _ l                .o. ! acageu͡rluq/acageʼu͡rluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) r u                         || Vow Vow ">"+ _ l         .o. ! uiruluq (HBC form)
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> "u͡r"                          || Vow Vow ">"+ _ l         .o. ! uiu͡rluq
                  ê ">"+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->)  ">" r u             || _ l                      .o. ! tumruluq (HBC form)
                  ê ">"+ r [ụ|ụ́] r -> e ">" ("ʼ") "u͡r"       || _ l                      .o. ! tumeu͡rluq/tumeʼu͡rluq
                  [e|é] ">"+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) ">" u "ʼ" r      || _ l                      .o. ! qaspuʼrluq (HBC form)
                  [e|é] ">"+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) e ">" ("ʼ") "u͡r" || _ l                      .o. ! qaspeu͡rluq/qaspeʼu͡rluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) r u                         || VowHatted ">"+ _ l       .o. ! nunaruluq (HBC form)
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> "ʼ" u r                       || VowHatted ">"+ _ l       .o. ! nunaʼurluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> ("ʼ") "u͡r"                    || [Vow|VowStress] ">"+ _ l  ;  ! angyau͡rluq/angyaʼu͡rluq

define DropHattedE ê -> 0 .o.
                [..] -> e || p _ ">"* p , t _ ">"* t , c _ ">"* c , k _ ">"* k , q _ ">"* q , 
                             v _ ">"* v , l _ ">"* l , s _ ">"* s , g _ ">"* g , r _ ">"* r , u͡g _ ">"* u͡g , u͡r _ ">"* u͡r ,
                             vv _ ">"* vv , ll _ ">"* ll , ss _ ">"* ss, gg _ ">"* gg , rr _ ">"* rr , u͡gg _ ">"* u͡gg , u͡rr _ ">"* u͡rr ,
                             v _ ">"* vv , l _ ">"* ll , s _ ">"* ss, g _ ">"* gg , r _ ">"* rr , u͡g _ ">"* u͡gg , u͡r _ ">"* u͡rr ,
                             m _ ">"* m , n _ ">"* n , ng _ ">"* ng , m̄ _ ">"* m̄ , n̄ _ ">"* n̄ , n͞g _ ">"* n͞g , 
                             w _ ">"* w , y _ ">"* y , c _ ">"* t , t _ ">"* c                                                       ; ! maybe c _ ">"* n , n _ ">"* c ??

define TripleConsonant  rr   ->  0 || _ q ">"* Con                .o. ! rqe- bases drop r
                       [..]  ->  e || Con _ ">"* [s|ss] ">"* Con  .o.
                       [..]  ->  e || Con ">"* t _ ">"* Con       .o.
                       [..] (->) e || Con ">"* Con _ ">"* Con     .o.
                       [..]  ->  e || Con _ ">"* Con ">"* Con      ;

define TripleVowel  AllFVow -> 0 || [Con|.#.] ">"* AllFVow ">"* _ ">"* AllFVow ">"* [Con|.#.] ;

define ConnectiveMood  ạ -> 0               || _ ">" [a|á] \.#.                          .o. ! caliạan -> calian 
                       ụ -> 0               || _ ">" [a|á] \.#.                          .o. ! calikụan -> calikan 
                       [e|é] -> e ("ʼ")     || [VowStress|VowHatted|Con] ">" ng _ [r|rr] .o. ! qavangrarpet -> qavange(ʼ)rpet
                       [e|é] -> "ʼ" e ("ʼ") || Vow ">" ng _ [r|rr]                        ;  ! iqvangrarma -> iqvangʼe(ʼ)rma

define WordAdjustments ġ -> 0       || Vow _                           .o. ! túntuvâyaġaq -> túntuvâyaaq 
                       t (->) c     || \.#. _ [e|é] ">"* t ,               ! angutet -> angucet
                                       \.#. _ [e|é] ">"* ss ">"* Stop  .o. ! kitugtesciigataqa -> kitugcesciigataqa
                       t [e|é] ">" rr (->) ">" q || _ Vow              .o. ! inarterraarluni -> inarqaarluni for -rraar- postbase
                       â r [a|á] (->) a "ʼ" a || ">" [q|k] _ q         .o. ! quuyurniqaraqluni -> quuyurniqaʼaqluni for -qaqe- postbase
                       [a|á] r [a|á] (->) a   || ">" [q|k] _ q         .o. ! nerqaraqluni -> nerqaqluni for -qaqe- postbase
                       [a|â|á] -> e || ">" q _ ">"* [r|rr]              ;  ! apteqarru -> apteqerru for -qar- postbase

define arDeletion  "â" -> a "ʼ" a,
                   "î" -> i "ʼ" i,
                   "û" -> u "ʼ" u  || _ ">"* Con ">"* "ạ" q ">"* .#.                    .o. ! V̂r(ar)# -> V'Vr
                   "ạ" q -> 0 || _ ">"* .#.                                             .o. ! wordFinal
                   ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] -> 0 || Vow ">"* VowStress ">"* Con ">"* _ ">"* Con .o. ! VV́r(ar) -> VV́r
                   "ạ" [r|rr] -> 0 || Con ">"* VowStress ">"* Con ">"* _ ">"* Con       .o. ! CV́r(ar) -> CV́r
                   "â" -> a "ʼ" á,
                   "î" -> i "ʼ" í,
                   "û" -> u "ʼ" ú  || _ ">"* Con ">"* ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] ">"* Con         .o. ! V̂r(ar) -> V'Vr
                   ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] -> 0 || Vow "ʼ" VowStress ">"* Con ">"* _ ">"* Con  .o. ! V̂r(ar) -> V'Vr
                   a -> á "ʼ",
                   e -> é "ʼ",
                   i -> í "ʼ",
                   u -> ú "ʼ" || _ ">"* Con ">"* "ạ́" [r|rr] ">"* Con                     .o. ! Vr(ár) -> V́(ʼ)r
                   "ạ́" [r|rr] -> 0 || VowStress "ʼ" ">"* Con ">"* _ ">"* Con             .o. ! Vr(ár) -> V́(ʼ)r
                   "ʼ" (->) 0 || VowStress _ ">"* Con                                     ;  ! Vr(ár) -> V́(ʼ)r


define RemoveApostrophe "ʼ" -> 0 || [ .#. | Con ] ">"* AllVow ">"* Con ">"* _ ">"* AllVow ">"* AllVow , ! [#|C]VCʼVV
                                    VoiceCon ">"*  _ ">"* VoiceCon                                    ; 

define AddApostrophe [..] -> "ʼ" || VlessCon _ ">"* VoiceCon , n _ ">"* g   ;      ! maybe VoiceFric _ ">"* VlessCon  ???

define ToOrthography  vv -> v,
                      ll -> l,
                      ss -> s,
                      gg -> g,
                      rr -> r,
                      u͡gg -> u͡g,
                      u͡rr -> u͡r || [ Stop | VlessFric ] ">"* _           ,
                                 _ ">"* [ Stop ]                        .o.
                      m̄ -> m,
                      n̄ -> n,
                      n͞g -> ng || [ Stop | VlessFric ] ">"* _           .o.
                      rr -> r  || _ ">"* .#.                            .o.
                      ss -> s  || .#. ">"*  _                           .o.
                      [â|á|ạ|ậ|ạ́] -> a                                  .o.
                      [ê|é] -> e                                        .o.
                      [î|í] -> i                                        .o.
                      [û|ú|ụ|ụ́|ụ̂] -> u                                  .o.
                      ["[e]"|"[é]"|"[ê]"] -> e                          .o.
                      ġ -> g                                             ;

define RemoveLigature m̄ (->) m     .o.
                      n̄ (->) n     .o.
                      n͞g (->) ng   .o.
                      u͡g (->) u g   .o.
                      u͡r (->) u r   .o.
                      u͡gg (->) u gg .o.
                      u͡rr (->) u rr  ;

define Lowercase "A"   -> a,
                 "B"   -> b,
                 "C"   -> c,
                 "D"   -> d,
                 "E"   -> e,
                 "F"   -> f,
                 "G"   -> g,
                 "H"   -> h,
                 "I"   -> i,
                 "J"   -> j,
                 "K"   -> k,
                 "L"   -> l,
                 "M"   -> m,
                 "N"   -> n,
                 "O"   -> o,
                 "P"   -> p,
                 "Q"   -> q,
                 "R"   -> r,
                 "S"   -> s,
                 "T"   -> t,
                 "U"   -> u,
                 "V"   -> v,
                 "W"   -> w,
                 "X"   -> x,
                 "Y"   -> y,
                 "Z"   -> z,
                 "M̄"   -> m̄,
                 "N̄"   -> n̄,
                 "Vv"  -> vv,
                 "Ll"  -> ll,
                 "Ss"  -> ss,
                 "Gg"  -> gg,
                 "Rr"  -> rr,
                 "Ng"  -> ng,
                 "N͞g"  -> n͞g,
                 "U͡g"  -> u͡g,
                 "U͡r"  -> u͡r,
                 "U͡gg" -> u͡gg,
                 "U͡rr" -> u͡rr;
                    
define FinalWordApostrophe Vow (->) "ʼ" || Con _ .#. ;

regex AutomaticDevoicing   .o.
      WeakInitialE         .o.
      urDeletion           .o. 
      DropHattedE          .o.
      TripleConsonant      .o.
      TripleVowel          .o.
      ConnectiveMood       .o.
      WordAdjustments      .o.
      arDeletion           .o.
      RemoveApostrophe     .o.
      AddApostrophe        .o.
      AutomaticDevoicing   .o.
      ToOrthography        .o.
      RemoveLigature       .o.
      Lowercase             ;
!      FinalWordApostrophe   ;
